District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.15a

Disposition of forfeitures.

Forfeitures in the Teacher’s Retirement Fund shall not be applied to increase the annuity of a person hereunder, but rather, shall be applied to pay administrative expenses, if and as directed by the District of Columbia Retirement Board, or used to reduce the District’s contributions.

History

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 875, ch. 779, Pub. L. 79-624, § 15a
as added May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-312, § 2(j), 60 DCR 3434

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-312 added this section.

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 2(j) of D.C. Law 19-313 added this section.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-313 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(j) of the Retirement of Public-School Teachers Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-41, March 25, 2013, 60 DCR 5361, 20 DCSTAT 527).